Washington statutes.
RCW 18.25.0193

Discrimination—Acceptance of services required.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the state and its political subdivisions shall accept the services of licensed chiropractors for any service covered by their licenses with relation to any person receiving benefits, salaries, wages, or any other type of compensation from the state, its agencies or subdivisions.

[ 1974 ex.s. c 97 s 2. Formerly RCW 18.25.130.]

NOTES:

Severability—1974 ex.s. c 97: See note following RCW 18.25.0192.